Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,318
Battery stewardship organization; costs; reimbursements; charges; duties.

A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan approved under section 81-15,317 shall:

(1) Be responsible for all costs associated with implementing the plan;

(2) Reimburse local governmental units for demonstrable costs incurred as a result of a local government facility or solid waste facility serving as a collection site under the plan; and

(3) Collect charges from participating producers sufficient to cover the costs of implementation, including battery collection, transportation, and processing, education and outreach, program evaluation, and payment of the annual fee to the department under section 81-15,317.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 5.